Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SERBIAN HOME.new text end new text begin $900,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Serbian Home on the National Registry of Historic Sites in South St. Paul to repair and preserve the cultural and historic landmark for the Serbian community. new text end